Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 11. Low-Profit Limited Liability Companies

§ 4161.
Election.

A limited liability company organized pursuant to this title may elect to be a low-profit limited liability company if and for so long at it satisfies the requirements of section 4162 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4162.
Requirements.

A limited liability company shall be organized for a business purpose that satisfies, and shall at all times be operated to satisfy, each of the following requirements:

The company:

significantly furthers the accomplishment of one or more charitable or educational purposes within the meaning of

26 U.S.C. § 170(c)

(2)(B); and

would not have been formed but for the company’s relationship to the accomplishment of charitable or educational purposes.

No significant purpose of the company is the production of income or the appreciation of property; provided, however, that the fact that a person produces significant income or capital appreciation shall not, in the absence of other factors, be conclusive evidence of a significant purpose involving the production of income or the appreciation of property.

No purpose of the company is to accomplish one or more political or legislative purposes within the meaning of

26 U.S.C. § 170(c)

(2)(D).

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4163.
Failure to meet requirements.

A limited liability company that elects to be an L3C and subsequently fails to satisfy any one of the requirements set forth in section 4162 of this title shall immediately cease to be a low-profit limited liability company, but by continuing to meet all the other requirements of this chapter, continues to exist as a limited liability company.

In the event an L3C fails to satisfy the requirements of section 4162 of this title, the company shall change its name to conform with subsection 4005(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.